Washington statutes.
RCW 15.09.055

Contracts and agreements.

The horticultural pest and disease board may enter into contracts and agreements with federal, state, and local government agencies, Indian tribes, and any other organization to perform any duties pursuant to the identification, detection, control, or eradication of horticultural pests and diseases.

[ 2000 c 144 s 35.]